Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3293
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Health Maintenance Organization Act, the definitions found in sections 44-3294 to 44-32,114 shall be used.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 2.